Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 15 Eminent Domain
18-15-606. Appeals.

Appeals may be taken by any party interested from the assessment and allotment of damages under the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 126, § 8, p. 183; C. & M. Dig., § 4041; Pope's Dig., § 5043; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-408.

18-15-607. Tapping of mains and supply pipes, nuisance, and pollution prohibited.

A person shall be guilty of a violation and fined for each and every offense in any sum not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) if the person shall:

(1)

Tap the main or supply pipe of any water plant or company without first obtaining the permission of the proper city authorities, corporation, or owner of the water plant;

(2)

Commit nuisance in or near the impounding dam or reservoir of any water plant; or

(3)

Pollute the water or affect its wholesome qualities.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 126, § 7, p. 183; C. & M. Dig., § 4040; Pope's Dig., § 5042; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-407; Acts 1997, No. 315, § 1; 2005, No. 1994, § 93.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in the introductory paragraph.

Subchapter 7

— Dams, Mills, Etc.

18-15-701. Findings no bar to prosecution or action under other law — Exception.

The inquest of the jury or the order and permission of the court founded thereupon shall not bar any prosecution or action, which any person would have had in law, had this subchapter not been passed, except for such injuries as were actually foreseen and estimated by the jury.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 98, § 22; C. & M. Dig., § 3964; Pope's Dig., § 4966; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-522.

18-15-702. Penalty.

Any person who shall build or raise any dam or any other stoppage or obstruction in or across any watercourse without first obtaining permission from the proper court, according to law, and shall thereby work any material injury to any other person by overflowing his or her lands, shall forfeit to the party injured double damages for the injury, to be recovered in a civil action.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 98, § 23; C. & M. Dig., § 3965; Pope's Dig., § 4967; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-523.

18-15-703. Nuisance.

All dams, stoppages, or obstructions not made according to law shall be deemed to be public nuisances and shall be dealt with accordingly.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 98, § 24; C. & M. Dig., § 3966; Pope's Dig., § 4968; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-524.

18-15-704. Erection of certain dams permitted.

By proceeding as provided in this subchapter, any person may erect a dam across any watercourse not being a navigable stream if the person is the proprietor of the land through which the watercourse runs at the point where he or she proposes to erect his or her dam.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 98, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 3943; Pope's Dig., § 4944; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-501.

18-15-705. Petition required.

(a)

If a dam is proposed to be erected pursuant to §18-15-704, the person proposing to erect the dam, if it is likely to overflow any lands on the stream belonging to other persons, shall file his or her petition for that purpose in the circuit court of the county in which he or she proposes to erect his or her mill or other machinery connected with the dam.

(b)

If a mill or other dam is proposed to be erected near a county line so as to overflow lands in an adjoining county, then the person proposing to erect the dam shall apply to the circuit court of both counties for the relief provided in this subchapter.

(c)

The petitioner shall set forth:

(1)

A description of the land and an abstract of the title thereto;

(2)

The name of the watercourse;

(3)

A description of the point at which he or she proposes to erect his or her dam;

(4)

The altitude of the dam which he or she proposes to erect; and

(5)

The kind of mill and other machinery which he or she proposes to connect with the dam.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 98, §§ 3-5; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3945-3947; Pope's Dig., §§ 4946-4948; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-503—35-505.

18-15-706. Issuance of writ — Inquiry by jury.

(a)(1)

On filing the petition, it shall be the duty of the court to cause a writ of ad quod damnum to be issued under the seal of the court.

(2)

The writ shall be directed to the sheriff, commanding him or her to summon twelve (12) fit persons of his or her county to meet at the place where the mill is proposed to be erected or the land overflowed, on a day named in the writ.

(3)

Then and there, it shall be the duty of the court to inquire by the jury, touching the matter contained in the petition, a copy of which shall accompany the writ.

(b)

It shall be the duty of the sheriff to attend with the jury on the day and at the place appointed, and upon full examination and inquiry by the jury, it shall find:

(1)

What will be the amount of damage to each proprietor by reason of inundation consequent upon the erection of the dam as proposed;

(2)

Whether the dwelling of any proprietor or the outhouses, curtilages, or gardens thereunto immediately belonging, or orchard, will be overflowed thereby;

(3)

Whether, and to what extent, ordinary navigation and the passage of fish will be obstructed by the erection, and whether and by what means the obstructions may be prevented or diminished; and

(4)

Whether the health of the neighborhood will be materially endangered in consequence of the erection.

(c)

The inquest of the jury shall be reduced to writing and, after being signed by each member of the jury, shall be returned by the sheriff together with the writ, and a statement of the manner in which he or she executed it, into the court which issued it, without delay.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 98, §§ 7, 8,11; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3949, 3950, 3953; Pope's Dig., §§ 4951, 4952, 4955; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-507, 35-508, 35-511.

18-15-707. Summons.

(a)

Upon the return of the inquest, the court shall cause the proprietor of the land, one (1) acre of which shall have been prayed for, and the several persons, who may be proprietors of the land found by the inquest returned to be liable to damage, to be summoned to appear in the same court on a day to be named in the summons and show cause, if any they can, why the person petitioning should not have permission to erect his or her dam.

(b)(1)

If the proprietor resides in the county in which the lands lie, the service of the summons shall be as in ordinary cases.

(2)

If the proprietor is not a resident in the county, then the service shall be by setting up a copy at the house of the tenant on the land, or if there is no tenant there, at some conspicuous place on the land.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 98, §§ 12, 13; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3954, 3955; Pope's Dig., §§ 4956, 4957; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-512, 35-513.

18-15-708. Refusal of permit.

If upon a view of the inquest returned by the sheriff and other evidence, if any shall be produced, it shall appear to the court that the dwelling of the proprietor, or outhouses, curtilages, or gardens thereunto belonging, or orchards, or fields will be overflowed, or that the health of the neighborhood will be materially annoyed by the stagnation of the waters consequent upon the erection of the proposed dam, then the court shall not permit the dam to be erected.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 98, § 14; C. & M. Dig., § 3956; Pope's Dig., § 4958; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-514.

18-15-709. Order.

(a)

If upon view it shall appear to the court that none of the evils provided against in §18-15-708 are likely to ensue, the court shall then consider whether, all circumstances weighed, it is reasonable that the permission to erect the dam as prayed for should be given, and thereupon make an order, giving permission or not accordingly.

(b)

The order and decree authorized by subsection (a) of this section and §18-15-712 and the rights and privileges thereby granted shall, in all cases, be upon and subject to the following conditions:

(1)

Such conditions in reference to the obstructions of the passage of fish as the court shall think proper to impose;

(2)

That all damages and valuations made and assessed by the jury shall be paid; and

(3)

That the dam and mills or other machinery shall be commenced within one (1) year, and they shall be finished and ready for business within three (3) years from the date of the order of permission.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 98, §§ 15, 17, 18; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3957, 3959, 3960; Pope's Dig., §§ 4959, 4961, 4962; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-515, 35-517, 35-518.

18-15-710. Rebuilding or repairing dam and mill.

Whenever the dam and mill or other machinery has been destroyed or materially impaired, they shall be rebuilt or repaired within three (3) years thereafter, but if the owner of the dam and mill is an infant, then the usual saving in favor of infants shall be effective.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 98, § 19; C. & M. Dig., § 3961; Pope's Dig., § 4963; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-519.

18-15-711. Raising of dam.

Any owner of any dam and mill, or other machinery erected by virtue of this subchapter, may raise his or her dam by permission of the court, under and by the same proceedings, rules, and conditions provided in this subchapter.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 98, § 21; C. & M. Dig., § 3963; Pope's Dig., § 4965; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-521; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 1685.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations”.

18-15-712. Erection of dam by owner of land on one side of watercourse.

(a)

Any person being the owner in fee simple of the land on one (1) side of a watercourse, including part of the bed of the watercourse at the point where he or she proposes to erect a dam, may erect the dam by proceeding as provided in this subchapter.

(b)(1)

The person proposing to erect a dam shall also file his or her petition, and in addition to the requisitions of §18-15-705, shall set forth the name and place of residence of the proprietor of the land on the other side of the watercourse whereon he or she would abut his or her dam and on what side of the watercourse he or she proposes to erect his or her mill or other machinery in connection with his or her dam.

(2)

The petition shall be filed in the county wherein he or she proposes to erect the mill or other machinery.

(c)

In this case, the sheriff shall further find by the jury the value of one (1) acre of ground on the opposite side of the watercourse, to include the place where the petitioner would abut his or her dam or build his or her mill or other machinery. The sheriff with the assistance of the jury shall set this one (1) acre of ground apart by metes and bounds.

(d)(1)

The sheriff shall notify the proprietor of the land, whereof one (1) acre is prayed for, of the time and place when and where he or she will take the inquest of the jury, if the proprietor is in his or her county, and, if not, the sheriff shall set up the notice at the house of the tenant of the land. If there is no tenant thereof, then the sheriff shall set up the notice at some conspicuous place on the land.

(2)

In discharging duties pursuant to this subchapter, the sheriff shall have power with the jury to go into and act in an adjoining county when necessary.

(e)

When the party petitioning shall have prayed for one (1) acre of ground whereupon to abut his or her dam, the court shall include in its order granting permission to erect the dam, a decree vesting the acre of land and the title thereof in the party petitioning and his or her heirs and assigns, forever.

(f)

In case of noncompliance with any of the conditions concerning building, rebuilding, or repairing, when the land of another has been decreed by the court for the purpose of an abutment, the land shall revert to and revest in the original owner or his or her legal representatives.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 98, §§ 2, 6, 9, 10, 16, 20; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3944, 3948, 3951, 3952, 3958, 3962; Pope's Dig., §§ 4945, 4950, 4953, 4954, 4960, 4964; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-502, 35-506, 35-509, 35-510, 35-516, 35-520.

18-15-713. Cutting canal through another's land.

Where mills or other machinery are proposed to be built, so as to be propelled by water drawn from lakes through canals cut therefrom, and the intended canal will be cut to pass through the land of other persons, the same procedure shall be pursued as in cases of streams.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 98, § 26; C. & M. Dig., § 3968; Pope's Dig., § 4970; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-526.

18-15-714. Right of third person to build.

If any person or his or her legal representatives to whom permission to erect a dam in virtue of this subchapter has been given shall fail to build, rebuild, or repair the dam, together with the mill or other machinery connected therewith, according to the requisitions of this subchapter or the conditions of the permission, it shall be lawful for any other person owning the land on one (1) side of the watercourse at the point where the dam was erected or was intended to be erected, or owning the land below or above, to build a dam and mill or other machinery thereon, as if no permission had been given, without incurring any liability on account of taking off or backing the water on the dam.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 98, § 25; C. & M. Dig., § 3967; Pope's Dig., § 4969; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-525.

Subchapter 8

— Navigation, Coal, and Stone Companies

Effective Dates.

Acts 1869 (Adj. Sess.), No. 48, § 12: effective on passage.

Acts 1909, No. 309, § 4: effective on passage.

18-15-801. Navigation companies connecting streams by railroad — Private purchases permitted.

Nothing in §§18-15-802 —18-15-806 shall prevent a company from making private contracts and purchases of lands from such owners as may be most agreeable to both parties.

History.

Acts 1869 (Adj. Sess.), No. 48, § 10, p. 102; C. & M. Dig., § 1756; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-710.

18-15-802. Navigation companies connecting streams by railroad — Power of eminent domain.

(a)(1)

Any company formed for the purpose of buying or building and owning one (1) or more steamboats, barges, and flatboats to be used in transporting freight and passengers on any river, lake, bayou, or other navigable stream, shall have the right-of-way, not exceeding two hundred feet (200') in width, over any strip of land connecting two (2) navigable streams, lakes, or bodies of water.

(2)

The strip of land shall not be more than five (5) miles in width for the purpose of erecting thereon dirt, plank, or horse railroads, and such other improvements as may be necessary for the convenience and business of the company.

(b)

No other company shall have right-of-way within a less distance than three (3) miles of the way claimed by the company first availing itself of the provisions of this section, §18-15-801, and §§18-15-803 —18-15-806.

History.

Acts 1869 (Adj. Sess.), No. 48, § 4, p. 102; C. & M. Dig., § 1750; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-704.

18-15-803. Navigation companies connecting streams by railroad — Petition.

Any company desiring to avail itself of the benefits of the right-of-way provided for in this subchapter shall petition the county court, or the judge thereof in vacation, of the county in which any lands are situated and over which a right-of-way is desired to appoint a jury of twelve (12) persons, qualified under the laws of this state to serve on juries, whose duties it shall be to appraise and ascertain the value of any lands over which a right-of-way is desired by any company petitioning, and provided for in this section.

History.

Acts 1869 (Adj. Sess.), No. 48, § 5, p. 102; C. & M. Dig., § 1751; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-705.

18-15-804. Navigation companies connecting streams by railroad — Jury.

(a)

When any company shall petition according to the requirements of §18-15-803, the county court, or the judge thereof in vacation, shall make an order appointing the jury immediately.

(b)

In the order, the jury shall be directed to ascertain and report to the court or judge, within thirty (30) days from the date of their appointments, the value of any lands which, under the provisions of this subchapter, they may be directed to ascertain.

(c)

The jury, before entering upon the discharge of their duties, shall take an oath that they will, as nearly as may be, ascertain the number of acres of land by them to be appraised, and report the numbers to the court or judge, together with the average value per acre of the land in cash.

History.

Acts 1869 (Adj. Sess.), No. 48, § 6, p. 102; C. & M. Dig., § 1752; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-706.

18-15-805. Navigation companies connecting streams by railroad — Jury report — Payment.

(a)(1)

When any jury reports, as provided in §18-15-804, it shall be the duty of the judge to cause the company to be notified that the report has been made.

(2)

If the company shall deposit, within fifteen (15) days after receiving the notice, with the county clerk the full amount of money at which any lands may have been appraised or valued by the jury appointed for that purpose, then the company shall be entitled to the use and possession of the appraised and valued lands.

(b)

However, before the company shall be entitled to the use or possession of any lands as provided in this section, the judge shall make an order that the amount deposited with the clerk shall be paid to the owner or owners of the lands.

History.

Acts 1869 (Adj. Sess.), No. 48, § 7, p. 102; C. & M. Dig., § 1753; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-707.

18-15-806. Navigation companies connecting streams by railroad — Order to vest land in petitioner.

(a)

When any lands shall have been so appraised and valued, when a due report of the appraisement has been made, and when the amount of money has been deposited with the clerk and ordered to be paid as provided in §18-15-805, it shall be the duty of the judge to make an order upon the records of his or her court that the lands so appraised shall vest in and belong to the company petitioning, as provided in §18-15-803.

(b)

The order shall contain a description of the lands, the amount at which they were valued by the appraisers, the fact that the amount was deposited with the clerk and ordered to be paid over to the original owner or owners, the date of the deposit and order, the names of the original owner or owners, and the corporate name of the company.

(c)(1)

When so made and certified by the judge, the order shall be recorded as other deeds of conveyance.

(2)

When so made, certified, and recorded, the order shall operate as, and have in law the effect of, conveyance in fee simple from the original owner or owners to the company of the lands named and described in the order.

History.

Acts 1869 (Adj. Sess.), No. 48, §§ 8, 9, p. 102; C. & M. Dig., §§ 1754, 1755; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-708, 35-709.

18-15-807. Packet, coal, and stone companies — Power of eminent domain.

(a)(1)

Any packet company organized under the laws of this state for the purpose of running boats as common carriers upon its navigable waters is given the right of eminent domain to establish landings and loading places upon any of the navigable streams of this state, or upon any creek or bayou emptying thereinto, with the right to deepen and widen the creeks and bayous for a distance not exceeding three (3) miles from their mouths, in order that they may become suitable harbors.

(2)

The landing and loading places shall not exceed ten (10) acres in extent at any one (1) place. All steamboats shall have the right to land, load, and unload at the landing places.

(b)

Packet companies and also all coal and stone companies are also given the right of eminent domain to condemn a right-of-way not exceeding fifty yards (50 yds.) in width for roads or tram roads, to be built from any navigable stream or creek, or bayou emptying thereinto, to any coal mine or stone quarry, in order that the products of the mines or quarries may be transported to the banks of the navigable rivers or to the creeks or bayous, and the right-of-way may be carried across the right-of-way of any railroad company.

(c)

The proceedings for the condemnation of the landing and loading places and rights-of-way shall be, in all things, the same as provided in §§18-15-1202 —18-15-1207.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 309, §§ 1-3, p. 925; C. & M. Dig., §§ 3973-3975; Pope's Dig., §§ 4975-4977; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-701 — 35-703.

Subchapter 9

— Public Landings

Effective Dates.

Acts 1909, No. 307, § 21: effective on passage.

18-15-901. Establishment.

(a)

All public landings shall be laid out, opened, and established in a manner agreeable to the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

The county court of each county shall have full power and authority to make and enforce all orders necessary for the establishment of public landings.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, § 1, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., § 4058; Pope's Dig., § 5061; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1001.

18-15-902. Notice of petition.

(a)(1)

Previous to any petition being presented for a public landing, notice shall be given by publication in some newspaper published in the county, if there is one.

(2)

If there is no newspaper published in the county, then notice shall be given by advertisement set up in three (3) public places in the township wherein it is sought to establish the public landing, stating the time when the petition is to be presented to the county court and the substance thereof.

(b)

The notice shall be duly authenticated and presented with the petition to the county court.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, § 4, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., § 4061; Pope's Dig., § 5064; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1004.

18-15-903. Landing and cotton yard.

(a)

Any five (5) or more freeholders residing in any county bordering on the Mississippi River or any other navigable river, bayou, bay, or inlet may petition the county court of that county to cause a lot of ground on the bank of the river, bayou, bay, or inlet to be designated and set apart as a steamboat landing and cotton yard for the use of the public, stating in the petition the name of the owner of the landing proposed to be so taken.

(b)

Any one (1) or more of the signers to the petition shall enter bond, with sufficient security, payable to the State of Arkansas for the use of the county, conditioned that the person or persons making application for the establishment of a public landing shall pay into the treasury of the county the amount of all costs and expenses accruing on the petition and the proceedings thereon.

(c)(1)

In cases in which the prayer of the petitioners shall not be granted or when proceedings had in pursuance thereof shall not be finally confirmed and established, and on neglect or refusal of the persons so bound, after a liability shall have accrued, to pay into the treasury, according to the tenor of the bond, all costs and expenses that shall have accrued, the clerk of the county court shall deliver the bond to the prosecuting attorney of the district, whose duty it shall be to collect and pay over the bond to the county treasury.

(2)

In all cases of contest, the court having jurisdiction of the case shall have power to render judgment for costs according to justice between the parties.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, § 2, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., § 4059; Pope's Dig., § 5062; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1002.

18-15-904. Petition to specify land.

All petitions for the laying out and establishment of public landings shall specify the land which is sought to be made a public landing.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, § 3, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., § 4060; Pope's Dig., § 5063; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1003.

18-15-905. Appointment and function of viewers.

(a)

On presentation of the petition and proof of notice of publication as provided in §18-15-902, and the county court being satisfied that proper notice has been given in accordance with the provisions of §18-15-907, the court shall appoint three (3) disinterested citizens of the county as viewers.

(b)

The viewers shall be a jury to assess and determine the compensation to be paid in money for the property sought to be appropriated without deduction for benefits to any property of the owner. They shall also assess and determine what damage the owner of the land where the public landing is to be established shall suffer by the establishment of the landing.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, § 5, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., § 4062; Pope's Dig., § 5065; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1005.

18-15-906. Order for viewers to proceed.

The county court shall issue its order directing viewers to proceed on the day to be named in the order or, on their failure to meet on that date, within five (5) days thereafter, to:

(1)

View, survey, lay out, and establish the public landing;

(2)

Determine whether the public convenience requires that the public landing shall be established; and

(3)

Report what amount of land is required for the public landing, not exceeding three (3) acres.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, § 7, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., § 4064; Pope's Dig., § 5067; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1007.

18-15-907. Notice of viewers' meeting.

(a)(1)

It shall be the duty of one (1) of the petitioners to give at least five (5) days' notice in writing to the owners or their agents, if residing within the county.

(2)

If the owner is a minor, an individual with intellectual disabilities, or an individual with mental illness, then a petitioner shall give notice to the guardian of the person, if a resident of the county, on whose land the public landing is proposed to be laid out and established, and also five (5) days' notice to the viewers named in the order of the county court of the time and place of meeting as specified in the order.

(b)

It is further made the duty of the petitioners, if the public landing is proposed to be laid out or established on any land owned by nonresidents of the counties, to cause notice to be given to the nonresidents of the county by publication for two (2) consecutive weeks in some newspaper published in the county. If there is no newspaper published in the county, then notice shall be given to the nonresidents by posting a notice of the time and place of the meeting of the viewers as specified in the order of the county court. Also the substance of the petition for the public landing shall be posted upon the door of the office of the clerk of the county court for at least two (2) weeks before the time fixed for the meeting of the viewers.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, § 8, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., § 4065; Pope's Dig., § 5068; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1008.

18-15-908. Proceedings and report of viewers.

(a)(1)

It shall be the duty of the viewers to meet at the time and place specified in the order or within five (5) days thereafter.

(2)(A)

After taking an oath or affirmation faithfully and impartially to discharge the duties of their appointments respectively, the viewers shall take to their assistance a surveyor and proceed to view, survey, lay out, and establish the public landing as prayed for in the petition, or as near the same as in their opinion a good public landing can be established and maintained at reasonable expense.

(B)

The viewers shall take into consideration the ground, convenience and inconvenience, and expense which will result to individuals as well as to the public if the public landing shall be established as petitioned.

(b)

The viewers shall assess and determine the damages sustained by any person on whose premises the public landing is proposed to be established.

(c)

The viewers shall make and sign a report, in writing, stating their opinion in favor of or against the establishment of the public landing, which shall set forth the reason for their opinion. The report shall:

(1)

Give a description and boundaries of the public landing, so that it can be readily found and located;

(2)

State the value of the property sought to be appropriated for the establishment of the public landing; and

(3)

State the amount of damages if any, and to whom due, which by them have been assessed and which would accrue by the establishment of the public landing.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, §§ 9-11, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4066-4068; Pope's Dig., §§ 5069-5071; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-1009 — 35-1011.

18-15-909. Assistance of viewers by surveyor.

The viewers may call a surveyor to assist them in laying out and surveying any public landing that they may be ordered by the court to lay out and establish.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, § 6, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., § 4063; Pope's Dig., § 5066; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1006.

18-15-910. Consequences of viewers' report.

(a)

On receiving the report of the viewers, the county court shall cause the report to be read publicly upon the second day of the term.

(b)

If no objection shall be made to the report and the court is satisfied that the public landing will be of sufficient importance to the public as to cause the damages and the compensation which have been assessed to be paid by the county, that the assessment is reasonable and just, and that the report of the viewers is favorable thereto, then the court shall order the compensation for the property to be paid to the person entitled thereto from the county treasury, and thenceforth the property shall be considered a public landing.

(c)

But if the court shall be of the opinion that the public landing is not of sufficient public utility for the county to pay the assessed compensation and damages and the petitioners refuse to pay the compensation and damages, then the public landing shall not be declared a public landing, and the costs accruing by reason of the application shall be paid by the petitioners as provided in this subchapter.

(d)(1)

If the report of the viewers is against the proposed public landing or, if in the opinion of the court, the proposed public landing is not of public utility, then no further proceedings shall be had thereon.

(2)

The obligor in the bond securing costs and expenses shall be liable for the full amount of the costs and expenses.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, § 12, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., § 4069; Pope's Dig., § 5072; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1012.

18-15-911. Order to open and maintain landing.

After any public landing as provided in this subchapter has been established and declared to be a public landing, the county court shall cause an order to be issued to the overseer of the road district in which the landing is located to open and maintain the landing as a public landing.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, § 13, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., § 4070; Pope's Dig., § 5073; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1013.

18-15-912. Review and appeal.

The right to have the county court review the proceedings to establish the public landing and the right to appeal from the final decision of the county court shall:

(1)

Be the same as provided by law; and

(2)

Be exercised in the same manner as provided by the statutes and laws of Arkansas for public roads and highways.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, § 15, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., § 4072; Pope's Dig., § 5075; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1015.

18-15-913. Public entry, use, and occupation upon order of payment.

In all cases in which damages for land proposed to be taken for the establishment of a public landing have been assessed in the manner provided in this subchapter and an order has been made for the payment to the owners of the amount so assessed, then it shall and may be lawful for the public to enter upon, use, and occupy the landing as a public landing.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, § 16, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., § 4073; Pope's Dig., § 5076; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1016.

18-15-914. Deposit upon controversy.

(a)

When the determination of questions in controversy in these proceedings is liable to inconvenience the public, the county court or the county judge, in vacation, shall designate an amount of money to be deposited by the petitioners, subject to the order of the court, for the purpose of making compensation and paying such damages as may be sustained when the amount thereof shall have been assessed as provided in this subchapter.

(b)

The court shall designate the place of the deposit, but the sum shall be refunded to the petitioners if the public landing is established and paid for out of county funds.

(c)

Whenever deposits have been made in compliance with the order of the court or judge, it shall be lawful for the public, prior to the assessment and payment of damages for the land, to enter upon and use the land as a public landing.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, §§ 17, 18, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4074, 4075; Pope's Dig., §§ 5077, 5078; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-1017, 35-1018.

18-15-915. Lease.

(a)

The county court may lease a public landing for a term not exceeding three (3) years and the lessee shall transact there only a general receiving and forwarding business.

(b)

In case of a lease, the county court shall fix, with power to alter, the schedules of rates and charges for receiving and forwarding freight. The court shall require of the lessee a bond, payable to the county, in a penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) as shall be proper, conditioned to observe the terms of the lease and to perform the duties imposed on the lessee by law.

(c)(1)

The lessee shall keep a schedule of rates conspicuously posted on the premises and shall allow all boats to land at the landing and to receive and discharge freight.

(2)

Any failure on the part of the lessee to comply with his or her duties as public landing keeper, or any overcharge of rates, shall subject the lessee and his or her sureties to a penalty of twenty dollars ($20.00) in favor of the party injured, to be recovered in any court having jurisdiction.

(d)

The lease provided in this section shall not abridge the right of any person to forward and receive his or her own freight at the public landing, free of charge.

(e)

Any funds arising from lease of public landings shall be paid into the county treasury and constitute a part of the public road fund for the road district wherein the landing is located.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, §§ 14, 19, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4071, 4076; Pope's Dig., §§ 5074, 5079; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 35-1014, 35-1019.

18-15-916. Fees and expenses.

(a)

For each day necessarily employed, to be charged as costs and expenses and paid out of the county treasury, all persons required to render services under the provisions of this subchapter shall receive:

(1)

As viewers or reviewers, one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per day;

(2)

As chain carriers or markers, one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per day; and

(3)

As surveyors, five dollars ($5.00) per day.

(b)

The amount due to each person and the number of days employed shall be certified under oath by the viewers or reviewers.

(c)

The county shall be reimbursed for the payments so made and for all other necessary expenses incident to proceedings by the petition, as provided in this subchapter.

(d)

The clerk of the county court shall receive the fees as by law he or she may be entitled to, the fees to be taxed as costs and paid as provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1909, No. 307, § 20, p. 916; C. & M. Dig., § 4077; Pope's Dig., § 5080; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1020.

Subchapter 10

— Levee and Drainage Districts

Cross References.

Condemnation of lands beyond district, §14-121-808.

Consent of state to right of United States for flood control purposes, §14-120-220.

Lateral ditches by landowners in district, right of eminent domain, §14-121-804.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1939, No. 83, § 3: approved Feb. 15, 1939. Emergency clause provided: “And it appearing that many levee and drainage districts in this state have been delayed in carrying out the objects and purposes for which they were created, which has in many instances worked a hardship on the landowners and taxpayers of said district due to the delay in the acquisition of easements and other agreements concerning the flowage and storage rights, all of which is detrimental to the public peace, health and safety, which is hereby ascertained, an emergency is hereby declared, and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1945, No. 177, § 13: approved Mar. 2, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “It is ascertained and hereby declared that the provisions of this act are necessary to aid the levee or drainage districts, or levee and drainage districts, of this state to obtain and receive the benefits of national flood control legislation to protect the people and properties of this state from floods, and this act being necessary for the protection of the public health and safety of the people of this state, an emergency is therefore declared, and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

18-15-1001. Purpose.

It is expressly declared to be the purpose of this section and §§18-15-1002 —18-15-1010 to enable levee and drainage districts in the State of Arkansas to acquire rights-of-way, borrow pits, and such other lands or rights as may be necessary for the purpose of extending, relocating, or draining any additional canal or ditch in any existing drainage district and for the purpose of extending, relocating, resetting, and enlarging any levee constructed by any levee district in the State of Arkansas without extending the boundaries of the district and without subjecting the lands of any drainage or levee district to taxation or special assessments because of the benefits that will accrue to the district and the lands therein by reason of the additional improvement contemplated, especially with funds of the United States Government, except such additional assessments as may be required on the lands of the district for the purpose of obtaining money with which to meet the requirements of the federal government in providing rights-of-way, borrow pits, and such other rights as the local agencies may be required to provide or furnish.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 177, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 35-1111.